Idaho, session 2026, H0700.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 44, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 28, Title 44, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 28
UNLAWFUL EMPLOYMENT OF UNAUTHORIZED ALIENS
44-2801. UNLAWFUL EMPLOYMENT OF UNAUTHORIZED ALIENS. (1) It shall be
unlawful for any employer; any person acting as an agent for an employer; any
person who, for a fee, refers an alien for employment; or any officer, agent,
or representative of a labor organization to knowingly employ, continue to
employ, rehire, recruit, or refer for employment in this state any alien who
is not lawfully present in the United States or whose immigration status does
not authorize employment under federal law. A violation of the provisions of
this subsection shall be a misdemeanor.
(2) For purposes of this section, an alien shall be deemed unauthorized
for employment if the alien:
(a) Is not lawfully present in the United States;
(b) Lacks a valid, unexpired federal immigration status that indepen-
dently authorizes employment; or
(c) Previously held employment authorization that was based on an un-
derlying immigration status that has expired, been terminated, or been
revoked.
(3) An employer who, after hiring an alien, knows or reasonably should
know that the alien's lawful immigration status or employment authorization
has expired, been revoked, or otherwise ceased shall not continue to employ
such alien.
(4)(a) An employer, or agent thereof, shall not be subject to criminal
liability pursuant to the provisions of this section with respect to a
specific employee if, prior to the commencement of employment:
(i) The employer verified the employee's identity and employment
eligibility through the federal e-verify program or any successor
program designated by the United States department of homeland se-
curity; and
(ii) The verification process resulted in a confirmation of em-
ployment authorization.


(b) Compliance with e-verify in good faith shall constitute an affirma-
tive defense to prosecution pursuant to this section.
(5) As used in this section, "employer," "employment," "knowingly,"
and "unauthorized alien" shall be construed with 8 U.S.C. 1324a.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.